Alaska statutes. Title 24. Legislature and Lobbying.
Chapter 30. Enactment of Statutes.

Secs. 24.30.010 — 24.30.100.
[Renumbered as AS 24.08.010 — 24.08.100.]

Sec. 24.30.110.
Effective date of laws. [Repealed, § 9 ch 126 SLA 1966.
For current law see AS 01.10.070.]

Sec. 24.30.120.
[Renumbered as AS 24.08.110.]

Sec. 24.30.130.
[Renumbered (a) as AS 24.08.200 and (b) as AS 24.08.210.]